Hawaii statutes.
§612-52 Grand jury counsel; qualifications.
The grand jury counsel shall be licensed to practice law before the supreme
court of the State, and shall not be a public employee. [L 1980, c 209, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next